Wisconsin, session 2025, AB874.
do enact as follows:AB874,11Section 1. 13.489 (1c) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 13.489 (1c) (aw).AB874,22Section 2. 13.489 (1c) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB874,2,5313.489 (1c) (am) “Categorical exclusion” means a categorical exclusion from a 4requirement to prepare an environmental assessment or environmental impact 5statement for a highway project as described under 23 CFR 771.117.AB874,36Section 3. 13.489 (4) (a) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB874,2,14713.489 (4) (a) 1. a. The commission determines that, within 6 years after the 8first July 1 after the date on which the commission recommends approval of the 9project, construction will be commenced on all projects enumerated under s. 84.013 10(3) and on the project recommended for approval and the commission has been 11notified that a final draft environmental impact statement or, draft environmental 12assessment, or draft categorical exclusion for the project has been approved by the 13department of transportation or, if necessary to secure federal funding, the federal 14highway administration.AB874,415Section 4. 13.489 (4) (a) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB874,3,41613.489 (4) (a) 1. b. The report recommending approval of the project is 17accompanied by a financing proposal that, if implemented, would provide funding 18in an amount sufficient to ensure that construction will commence on all projects 19enumerated under s. 84.013 (3) and on the project within 6 years after the first July 201 after the date on which the commission recommends approval of the project and 1the commission has been notified that a final draft environmental impact 2statement or, draft environmental assessment, or draft categorical exclusion for the 3project has been approved by the department of transportation or, if necessary to 4secure federal funding, the federal highway administration.AB874,55Section 5. 13.489 (4m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB874,3,12613.489 (4m) (a) Notwithstanding sub. (4), for any major highway project 7described in s. 84.013 (1) (a) 2m., the department of transportation shall submit a 8report to the commission, prior to construction of the project, which report may 9request the commission’s approval to proceed with the project. The department 10may submit this request at any time following completion by the department of a 11draft environmental impact statement or, draft environmental assessment, or draft 12categorical exclusion for the project.AB874,3,1313